Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Organization.

Sec. 44.46.010.
Commissioner of environmental conservation.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Environmental Conservation is the commissioner of environmental conservation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Collateral references. —

61B Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, § 1 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 44.46.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Environmental Conservation shall

have primary responsibility for coordination and development of policies, programs, and planning related to the environment of the state and of the various regions of the state;

have primary responsibility for the adoption and enforcement of regulations setting standards for the prevention and abatement of all water, land, subsurface land, and air pollution, and other sources or potential sources of pollution of the environment, including by way of example only, petroleum and natural gas pipelines;

promote and develop programs for the protection and control of the environment of the state;

take actions that are necessary and proper to further the policy declared in AS

46.03.010

;

adopt regulations for

the prevention and control of public health nuisances;

the regulation of sanitation and sanitary practices in the interest of public health;

standards of cleanliness and sanitation in connection with the construction, operation, and maintenance of a camp, cannery, food handling establishment, food manufacturing plant, mattress manufacturing establishment, industrial plant, school, barbershop, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, body piercing, or ear piercing establishment, soft drink establishment, beer and wine dispensaries, and for other similar establishments in which lack of sanitation may create a condition that causes disease;

the regulation of quality and purity of commercially compressed air sold for human respiration.

The department’s regulations for tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring shops, and body piercing shops must include requirements that

the shop be equipped with appropriate sterilizing equipment, with availability of hot and cold running water, and with an appropriate waste receptacle;

the owner of the shop is responsible for ensuring that case history cards are kept for each client for a period of three years after the client’s most recent tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing;

a practitioner in the shop may use only instruments for tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing that have been sterilized in accordance with methods approved by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 120 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 51, § 40 (1981); am § 32 ch 57 SLA 1999; am §§ 29, 30 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics schools and shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 2.

For body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 3.

For schools, see 18 AAC 30, art. 3.

For public accommodations, see 18 AAC 30, art. 4.

For public swimming pools and spas, see 18 AAC 30, art. 5.

For public toilets, showers, and laundromats, see 18 AAC 30, art. 6.

For compressed air, see 18 AAC 30, art. 9.

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For equipment and utensils, see 18 AAC 31, art. 4.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For shellfish processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 2.

For smoked or smoke-flavored seafood products processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 3.

For thermal processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 4.

For direct-market fishing vessels, see 18 AAC 34, art. 5.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

For direct-market land-based facilities, see 18 AAC 34, art. 7.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For underground storage tank laboratory approval, see 18 AAC 78, art. 8.

For purpose, applicability, and term, see 18 AAC 83, art. 1.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

For permit application requirements, see 18 AAC 83, art. 4.

For permit conditions — general, see 18 AAC 83, art. 5.

For requirements and permit conditions specific to type of discharge, see 18 AAC 83, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a)(5)(C), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 44.46.025.
Fees for services.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

37.10.050

—

37.10.056

, the Department of Environmental Conservation may adopt regulations that prescribe reasonable fees, and establish procedures for the collection of those fees, to cover the applicable direct costs, not including travel except in the case of a designated regulatory service, as that term is defined in AS

37.10.058

, of inspections, permit preparation and administration, plan review and approval, and other services provided by the department relating to

animals and animal products under AS 03.05; food, drugs, and cosmetics under AS 17.20; and public accommodations and facilities under AS 18.35;

certificates of inspection for motor vehicles under AS

46.14.400

or

46.14.510

;

drinking water systems under AS

46.03.720

;

water and wastewater operator training under AS 46.30;

waste management and disposal authorizations under AS

46.03.100

;

certification of laboratories conducting environmental analyses of public drinking water systems or of oil or hazardous substances, or conducting other analyses required by the department;

certification of federal permits or authorizations under 33 U.S.C. 1341 (sec. 401, Clean Water Act);

regulation of point source discharges of pollutants under the program authorized by AS

46.03.020

(12);

regulation of pesticides and broadcast chemicals registered under AS

46.03.320(a)(4)

, with a reasonable fee not to exceed $120;

licensing of pesticide applicators under AS

46.03.320(b)

, with a reasonable fee not to exceed $25.

The department may not charge a fee for a service that is provided by a municipality under a delegation by the department to the municipality.

The department may adopt regulations that prescribe reasonable fees to cover the direct and indirect costs of air quality permit programs under AS 46.14 and may establish procedures for the collection of those fees.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may not charge a fee for inspection, permit preparation and administration, plan review and approval, or other services provided by the department under AS 03.05 or AS

44.46.020

(5) to a school. In this subsection, “school” means a public school or private school for children of school age, as defined in AS

14.03.070

, or a head start center that receives federal financial assistance under 42 U.S.C. 9835.

In (a)(9) and (10) of this section, “reasonable fee” means a fee that does not unduly interfere in the conduct of commerce in the state.

History.

(§ 63 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 76, 77 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 12, 13 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 43 ch 128 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 42 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 77, ch. 63, SLA 1993 enacted a subsection (c) for this section that is almost identical to that enacted by § 13, ch. 74, SLA 1993 and set out above. The only difference between the two is that the latter contains the words “and indirect” after the word “direct”. Because § 13, ch. 74, SLA 1993 was the later enactment and had an immediate effective date, the amendment made by ch. 63 will not be codified.

In 1998, in the last sentence of (d) of this section, “subsection” was substituted for “section” to correct a manifest error in ch. 90, SLA 1995.

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 18 AAC 15, art. 4.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For animal disease control and eradication, see 18 AAC 36, art. 2.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 4.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For underground storage tank laboratory approval, see 18 AAC 78, art. 8.

For laboratory certification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 11.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 44.46.028.
Flow-through hot springs.

A flow-through hot springs, whether natural or modified, when used for perceived medicinal or esthetic purposes, is exempt from further water quality regulation by the Department of Environmental Conservation while the fecal coliform count is maintained at 100 colonies or less per 100 milliliters and the body of water is free from dangerous levels of disease-causing pathogens or chemicals.

In this section, “flow-through hot springs” means a body of water in which naturally occurring geothermal water enters the body of water to replace an equal amount of water constantly being drained from the body of water.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2002)

Sec. 44.46.029.
Dental radiological equipment.

This chapter does not authorize the department to register, inspect, test, or otherwise regulate dental radiological equipment or records relating to dental radiological equipment regulated by the Board of Dental Examiners under AS

08.36.075

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 79 SLA 1998)